Utah statutes.
78B-10-114.   Application to existing agreements or referrals.

(1)  This chapter governs a mediation pursuant to a referral or an agreement to mediate made on or after May 1, 2006.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), on or after May 1, 2007, this chapter governs all agreements to mediate whenever made.

